District of Columbia statutes.
7-2361.08

Relation to other laws.

(a)

This chapter does not limit rights, privileges, or immunities provided to volunteer health practitioners by laws other than this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, this chapter does not affect requirements for the use of health practitioners pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, may incorporate into the emergency forces of the District volunteer health practitioners who are not officers or employees of the District.

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 9, 57 DCR 3655
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.